Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1859.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 150.19c of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created within the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation a Cyber Crime and Fraud Unit. The Unit shall operate
as an internal division of the Bureau and shall exercise only those
investigative powers and the jurisdiction granted to the Bureau by
Oklahoma Statutes.
B. The purpose of the Cyber Crime and Fraud Unit shall be to
enhance the capacity of the Bureau to investigate:

1. Cyber-enabled criminal activity including intrusions,
network breaches, ransomware, digital extortion, and online
exploitation;
2. Financial fraud and related schemes including cyber-
facilitated fraud, identity theft, and complex financial deception;
and
3. Criminal activity involving digital evidence, consistent
with the existing statutory authority of the Bureau.
C. Nothing in this act shall be construed to expand or modify
the jurisdiction of the Bureau. The Unit may only initiate or
conduct investigations as follows:
1. Upon request or referral from a district attorney, law
enforcement agency, or state officer authorized under existing law;
2. Upon direction of the Governor, consistent with current
statutory authority; or
3. As the Bureau is otherwise permitted under existing
statutes.
D. The Cyber Crime and Fraud Unit shall:
1. Conduct investigations involving cybercrime, digital
evidence, and fraud-related offenses;
2. Provide digital forensics, technical assistance, and
analytical support to Bureau agents and requesting agencies;
3. Coordinate with federal, state, tribal, and local partners
on cyber and fraud investigations;
4. Develop and provide training to law enforcement agencies on
cybercrime trends, digital evidence handling, and fraud prevention;
and
5. Maintain specialized personnel, including agents, analysts,
forensic examiners, and technical support staff.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1859 Page 2

E. The Director of the Bureau may assign personnel, reallocate
resources, and establish internal procedures necessary to carry out
the responsibilities of the Unit.
F. The Bureau may promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions
of this act.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 150.19d of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation to be designated the
“Cyber Crime and Fraud Unit Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing
fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of
any monies received by the Bureau for deposit in the fund. All
monies accruing to the credit of such fund are hereby appropriated
and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation for the purpose of carrying out the duties and
functions prescribed in Section 1 of this act. Expenditures from
such fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1859 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 14th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1859 Page 4